Florida, session 2026, HB29.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 381.993, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.993 Sale and purchase of ivermectin.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "over-the-counter
medication" means a medication that may be legally sold and
purchased without a prescription or consultation with a health
care provider.
(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, ivermectin
suitable for human use may be sold and purchased as an over-the-
counter medication in this state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb29-00